Louisiana, session 2026, SB48.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:404(F)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:404(G)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§404. Operation of motor vehicles by nonresidents, students, and military personnel
and dependents; reciprocity agreements with foreign countries
* * *
F.(1) The deputy secretary of public safety services of the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations as may be necessary to enter into reciprocity agreements with
jurisdictions or agencies in foreign countries or with foreign governments that issue
driver's licenses or the equivalent.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 48 ENROLLED
G. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall enter a reciprocity agreement with the country of Ireland.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.